Hawaii, session 2026, HB2474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the existing scope of chapter 229, Hawaii Revised Statutes, needs to be broadened because, at present, it focuses largely on sister-state or province partnerships.  The legislature further finds that modern government-to-government work requires the ability to enter into nonbinding memoranda of understanding with national governments or ministries, regional bodies, and other international partners. This will enable the State to advance in key areas, including agriculture, biosecurity, climate resilience, indigenous knowledge, education, renewable energy, and economic development. The legislature also finds that it is important for international agreements between the State and other governments to be transparent to the public and subject to public input. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Authorize the State to enter into nonbinding international cooperative agreements with national governments; national ministries, departments, or agencies; provincial or regional governments; or international intergovernmental bodies relevant to the interests of the State or an international partner; (2)  Expand the definition of sister-state or province partnerships to include a partnership between the State and a prefecture or foreign nation; and (3)  Require the Hawaii sister-state and international partnerships commission to evaluate how a sister-state or province partnership or international cooperative agreement will enhance certain key state initiatives. SECTION 2.  Chapter 229, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§229-     Purpose.  The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate the State's engagement in international, regional, and sister-state or province partnerships and international cooperative agreements to support the cultural, educational, environmental, and economic goals of the State or an international partner.  This chapter authorizes the State to enter into sister-state or province partnerships and international cooperative agreements with foreign national governments, foreign subnational jurisdictions, and regional intergovernmental partners. §229-     International cooperative agreements; authorized.  (a) The governor may propose that the State enter into nonbinding international cooperative agreements with national governments; national ministries, departments, or agencies; provincial or regional governments; or international intergovernmental bodies relevant to the interests of the State or an international partner and may forward the proposal to the legislature. (b) The legislature, through concurrent resolution or by enacting session law to that effect, may enter into nonbinding international cooperative agreements with national governments; national ministries, departments, or agencies; provincial or regional governments; or international intergovernmental bodies relevant to the interests of the State or an international partner. (c) Any international cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (b): (1)  Shall be nonbinding; (2)  Shall not create legally enforceable obligations; and (3)  Shall not constitute any treaty, alliance, compact, or other agreement that is prohibited by Article I, Section 10, of the United States Constitution." SECTION 3.  Chapter 229, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "[[]CHAPTER 229[]] INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS; SISTER-STATE [AND] OR PROVINCE [RELATIONSHIPS] PARTNERSHIPS; INTERNATIONAL COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS" SECTION 4.  Section 229-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§229-1 Definitions.  For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: "Commission" means the Hawaii sister-state and international partnerships commission established under section 229-2. "International cooperative agreement" means a formal recognition of a joint agreement with a focus on an issue of mutual interest or concern between the State and the state, province, prefecture, or similar governmental or political subdivision of a foreign nation, or between the State and a foreign nation, as appropriate. "Sister-state or province partnership" means a partnership between the State [of Hawaii] and the state [or], province, prefecture, or similar governmental or political subdivision of a foreign nation[.], or between the State and a foreign nation, as appropriate." SECTION 5.  Section 229-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The commission shall support the governor, legislature, and office of international affairs in building and maintaining strategic long-term sister-state or province partnerships and international cooperative agreements that promote and enrich the people, cultures, environments, and economies of the State and its international partners." SECTION 6.  Section 229-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§229-3  Initiating sister-state [relationships.] or province partnerships; proposal review; international cooperative agreements.  (a)  The commission [shall] may evaluate and develop recommendations for the initiation of [all] sister-state or province partnerships or international cooperative agreements and forward its recommendation to the legislature.  Any evaluation made shall consider how the sister-state or province partnership or international cooperative agreement will enhance key state initiatives, including how it will support economic development, trade, education, agriculture, and biosecurity. (b)  The legislature[, if it so chooses, shall] may implement [the recommendation to initiate] a sister-state or province partnership or international cooperative agreement by either adopting a concurrent resolution or by enacting session law to that effect." SECTION 7.  Section 229-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "§229-4  Maintaining sister-state [relationships.] or province partnerships." SECTION 8.  Section 229-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "§229-5  Dissolving sister-state [relationships.] or province partnerships." SECTION 9.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 10.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.